Tennessee, session 114, HB0077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-134, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(m)
(1) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (l), after a petition has been
filed alleging delinquency based on conduct that is designated a crime or public
offense under the laws, including local ordinances, of this state, the court, before
hearing the petition on the merits, shall transfer the child to the sheriff of the
county to be held according to law and to be dealt with as an adult in the criminal
court of competent jurisdiction. The disposition of the child shall be as if the child
were an adult if:
(A) The child was sixteen (16) years of age or older at the time of
the alleged conduct;
(B) The child has a prior adjudication of delinquency for any
offense; and
(C) The court finds:
(i) There is probable cause to believe that the child
committed the delinquent act as alleged; and
(ii) The child is not committable to an institution for the
developmentally disabled or mentally ill.
HB0077
000871
- 1 -

(2) A hearing to determine whether the requirements of subdivision
(m)(1) have been met must be held in conformity with §§ 37-1-124, 37-1-126,
and 37-1-127.
(3) Reasonable notice in writing of the time, place, and purpose of the
hearing must be given to the child, the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian at least fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-134(c), is amended by deleting
"The transfer pursuant to subsection (a)" and substituting "A transfer pursuant to subsection (a)
or (m)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-159(d)(2), is amended by
deleting "§ 37-1-134(a) and (b)" and substituting "§ 37-1-134(a), (b), or (m)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g)(1)(B).
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
- 2 - 000871